Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2718
Foreclosure consulting contract and notices; English required; translation into other language.

A foreclosure consulting contract, and all notices of cancellation provided for therein, shall be written in English and shall be accompanied by a written translation from English into any other language principally spoken by the homeowner, certified by the person making the translation as a true and correct translation of the English version. The translated version shall be presumed to have equal status and credibility as the English version.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 18.